Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.215.030

Allocations pending receipt of federal funds.

In the event the legislature appropriates any moneys to carry out the purposes of RCW 28A.215.010 through 28A.215.050, allocations therefrom may be made to school districts for the purpose of underwriting allocations made or requested from federal funds until such federal funds are available. Any school district may allocate a portion of its funds for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of RCW 28A.215.010 through 28A.215.050 pending the receipt of reimbursement from funds made available by acts of congress.

[ 1995 c 335 s 309; 1990 c 33 s 211; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.34.040. Prior: 1943 c 220 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5109-3. Formerly RCW 28A.34.040, 28.34.040.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.